Maryland, session 2026, SB0355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
2–402.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, to apply for a license, [one
of the] BOTH parties to be married shall:
(1) appear before the clerk and give, under oath, the following information,
which shall be placed on an application form by the clerk:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0355*

SENATE BILL 355
(i) the full legal name of each party;
(ii) the place of residence of each party;
(iii) the date of birth of each party;
(iv) whether the parties are related by blood or marriage and, if so,
in which degree of relationship;
(v) the marital status of each party; and
(vi) whether either party was married previously, and the date and
place of each death or judicial determination that ended any former marriage;
(2) sign the application form; and
(3) provide the clerk with:
(i) the Social Security number of each party who has a Social
Security number; and
(ii) a copy of an official government–issued birth certificate or other
official government–issued document or record demonstrating the age of each party.
(d) (1) If the parties to be married are not residents of the county where the
marriage ceremony is to be performed, the clerk shall accept, instead of the application
specified in subsection (b) of this section, an affidavit from one of the parties to be married.
(2) The affidavit required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall:
(i) contain the information required by subsection (b) of this section;
and
(ii) be sworn to under oath before a clerk or other comparable official
in the county, state, province, or country where the party resides.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.